lexc/proclitic.lexc
!***** proclitic.lexc *****
! Th. Fransen, 13/08/19

!\\\\\ DECLARE MULTICHAR SYMBOLS /////

Multichar_Symbols

! *UPPER symbols (Tags)*

+
+A
+B
+C
+1P
+2P
+3P
+AUG
+FEM
+H
+IMP
+INTERR
+LEN
+MASC
+NAS
+NEG
+NEUT
+CONJ_PART
+PL
+PRON
+PV1
+REL
+SG

! *LOWER symbols (Triggers)*

^M
^N
^PRONa

! *Flags*

@P.PART.NO@
@P.PV.AD@
@P.PV.ARE@
@P.PV.COM@
@P.PV.FO@
@P.PV.IMBI@
@P.PV.TO@
@P.PV.SV@	! substantive verb

!\\\\\ BEGIN CONTINUATION CLASSES /////

!*** Root = start ***

LEXICON Root
				Preverb;
				conjPart;
@P.PART.NO@		No;
				Ro;
				
!*** Preverbs ***
	
LEXICON Preverb
@P.PV.AD@			AD;
@P.PV.ARE@			ARE;
@P.PV.COM@			COM;
@P.PV.FO@			FO;
@P.PV.IMBI@			IMBI;
@P.PV.TO@			TO;
@P.PV.SV@ad+PV1:at	#;	! substantive verb

LEXICON AD
ad+PV1:ad			#;
ad+PV1:at			pronB;
ad+PV1+REL+LEN:ad	#;
ad+PV1+REL+NAS:ad	#;
ad+PV1+REL+LEN:a	pronC;
ad+PV1+REL+NAS:an	pronC;

LEXICON ARE
are+PV1:ar				#;
are+PV1:aru				pronA;
are+PV1:aro				pronA;
are+PV1:ari				pronA;
are+PV1:ara				pronA;
are+PV1+REL+LEN:ara		#;
are+PV1+REL+NAS:ara		#;
are+PV1+REL+LEN:ar		pronC;
are+PV1+REL+NAS:aran	pronC;

LEXICON COM
com+PV1:con				#;
com+PV1:cot				pronB;
com+PV1+REL+LEN:con		#;
com+PV1+REL+NAS:con		#;
com+PV1+REL+LEN:co		pronC;
com+PV1+REL+NAS:con		pronC;
	
LEXICON FO
fo+PV1:fo			#;
fo+PV1:fo			pronA;
fo+PV1+REL+LEN:fo	#;
fo+PV1+REL+NAS:fo	#;
fo+PV1+REL+LEN:fo	pronC;
fo+PV1+REL+NAS:fon	pronC;

LEXICON IMBI
imbi+PV1:i^M				#;
imbi+PV1:i^Mu				pronA;
imbi+PV1:i^Mi				pronA;
imbi+PV1+REL+LEN:i^Me		#;
imbi+PV1+REL+NAS:i^Me		#;
imbi+PV1+REL+LEN:i^Mu		pronC;
imbi+PV1+REL+LEN:i^Mi		pronC;
imbi+PV1+REL+NAS:i^Mun		pronC;
imbi+PV1+REL+NAS:i^Min		pronC;

LEXICON TO
to+PV1:do			#;
to+PV1:do			pronA;
to+PV1+REL+LEN:do	#;
to+PV1+REL+NAS:do	#;
to+PV1+REL+LEN:do	pronC;
to+PV1+REL+NAS:don	pronC;

!*** Conjunct particles ***

LEXICON conjPart
ní+CONJ_PART+NEG:ní		#;
ní+CONJ_PART+NEG:ní		pronA;
ní+CONJ_PART+NEG:ní		roNonRel;

ná+CONJ_PART+IMP+NEG:ná								#;
ná+CONJ_PART+IMP+NEG:nach							pronNach;
ná+CONJ_PART+IMP+NEG+PRON+B+3P+SG+NEUT+LEN:nadid	#;

in+CONJ_PART+INTERR+NAS:in	#;
in+CONJ_PART+INTERR:in		pronC;
in+CONJ_PART+INTERR:in		roNonRel;

nád+CONJ_PART+INTERR+NEG:nád							#;
nád+CONJ_PART+INTERR+NEG:ná								roNonRel;
nád+CONJ_PART+INTERR+NEG+PRON+C+3P+SG+NEUT+LEN:nadid	#;
nád+CONJ_PART+INTERR+NEG:innach							pronNach;

nád+CONJ_PART+REL+NEG+LEN:nád						#;
nád+CONJ_PART+REL+NEG+NAS:nád						#;
nád+CONJ_PART+REL+NEG:ná							roRel;
nád+CONJ_PART+REL+NEG:nach							pronNach;
nád+CONJ_PART+REL+NEG+PRON+C+3P+SG+NEUT+LEN:nadid	#;

!*** No ***

LEXICON No
no+CONJ_PART:no				#;	
no+CONJ_PART+REL+LEN:no		#;
no+CONJ_PART+REL+NAS:no		#;
no+CONJ_PART:no				pronA;
no+CONJ_PART+REL+LEN:no		pronC;
no+CONJ_PART+REL+NAS:non	pronC;

!*** Ro ***

LEXICON Ro
	roNonRel;
	roRel;

LEXICON roNonRel
+ro+AUG:ro	#;
+ro+AUG:ro	pronA;

LEXICON roRel
+ro+AUG+REL+LEN:ro		#;
+ro+AUG+REL+NAS:ro		#;
+ro+AUG+REL+LEN:ro		pronC;
+ro+AUG+REL+NAS:ron		pronC;

!\\\\\ INFIXED PRONOUNS /////

LEXICON pronA
+PRON+A+1P+SG+LEN:^M			#; 	
+PRON+A+2P+SG+LEN:t				#;	
+PRON+A+3P+SG+MASC+NAS:^PRONa	#;
+PRON+A+3P+SG+FEM:s				#;
+PRON+A+3P+SG+FEM+NAS:s			#;
+PRON+A+3P+SG+NEUT+LEN:^PRONa	#;
+PRON+A+1P+PL:^N				#; 
+PRON+A+2P+PL:b					#; 
+PRON+A+3P+PL:s					#;
+PRON+A+3P+PL+NAS:s				#;

LEXICON pronB
+PRON+B+1P+SG+LEN:om		#; 
+PRON+B+1P+SG+LEN:um		#;
+PRON+B+1P+SG+LEN:am		#;
+PRON+B+1P+SG+LEN:amm		#;
+PRON+B+2P+SG+LEN:ot		#;			
+PRON+B+2P+SG+LEN:at		#;
+PRON+B+2P+SG+LEN:0			#;
+PRON+B+3P+SG+MASC+NAS:0	#;
+PRON+B+3P+SG+MASC+NAS:a	#;
+PRON+B+3P+SG+FEM+H:a		#;
+PRON+B+3P+SG+NEUT+LEN:0	#;
+PRON+B+1P+PL:an			#;
+PRON+B+1P+PL:ann			#;
+PRON+B+2P+PL:ob			#; 
+PRON+B+2P+PL:ab			#; 
+PRON+B+3P+PL+H:a			#;

LEXICON pronC
+PRON+C+1P+SG+LEN:dom		#; 
+PRON+C+1P+SG+LEN:dum		#; 
+PRON+C+1P+SG+LEN:dam		#;
+PRON+C+1P+SG+LEN:damm		#; 
+PRON+C+2P+SG+LEN:dat		#;			
+PRON+C+2P+SG+LEN:dit		#;	
+PRON+C+3P+SG+FEM+H:da		#;
+PRON+C+1P+PL:don			#;
+PRON+C+1P+PL:dun			#;
+PRON+C+1P+PL:din			#; 
+PRON+C+1P+PL:dan			#;
+PRON+C+1P+PL:dann			#;
+PRON+C+2P+PL:dob			#;
+PRON+C+2P+PL:dub			#;
+PRON+C+2P+PL:dib			#;
+PRON+C+2P+PL:dab			#;
+PRON+C+3P+PL+H:da			#;
	
LEXICON pronNach 
+PRON+1P+SG+LEN:am			#;
+PRON+1P+SG+LEN:im			#;
+PRON+2P+SG+LEN:at			#;
+PRON+2P+SG+LEN:it			#;
+PRON+3P+SG+MASC+NAS:		#;
+PRON+3P+SG+FEM+H:a			#;
+PRON+3P+SG+NEUT+LEN:		#;
+PRON+3P+SG+NEUT+LEN:id		#;
+PRON+1P+PL:an				#;
+PRON+2P+PL:ab				#;
+PRON+3P+PL+H:a				#;
